xal.sbl
/* Stemmer for Kalmyk
		* author: Badma Ontaev
		* e-mail: ontaev@gmail.com
		* version: 0.1
*/

stringescapes { }

/* Kalmyk alphabet in Unicode 

	a' - ә, g' - һ, zh' - җ, n' - ң, o' - ө, u' - ү

*/

stringdef a    hex '430'
stringdef a'   hex '4D9'
stringdef b    hex '431'
stringdef v    hex '432'
stringdef g    hex '433'
stringdef g'   hex '4BB'
stringdef d    hex '434'
stringdef e    hex '435'
stringdef zh   hex '436'
stringdef zh'  hex '497'
stringdef z    hex '437'
stringdef i    hex '438'
stringdef i'   hex '439'
stringdef k    hex '43A'
stringdef l    hex '43B'
stringdef m    hex '43C'
stringdef n    hex '43D'
stringdef n'   hex '4A3'
stringdef o    hex '43E'
stringdef o'   hex '4E9'
stringdef p    hex '43F'
stringdef r    hex '440'
stringdef s    hex '441'
stringdef t    hex '442'
stringdef u    hex '443'
stringdef u'   hex '4AF'
stringdef f    hex '444'
stringdef kh   hex '445'
stringdef ts   hex '446'
stringdef ch   hex '447'
stringdef sh   hex '448'
stringdef shch hex '449'
stringdef tv   hex '44A'
stringdef y    hex '44B'
stringdef mya  hex '44C'
stringdef e'   hex '44D'
stringdef iu   hex '44E'
stringdef ia   hex '44F'

externals (stem)

/* integers (p1) */
groupings (vowel)

routines (
 
	noun_possessive
    noun_impersonal_possessive
	noun
    noun_double_declination
	noun_plural
    verb_number_person
    verb_tense_mood
    verb_stem
)

define vowel '{a}{e}{i}{o}{u}{y}{e'}{iu}{ia}{a'}{o'}{u'}'


backwardmode (


/*---------------------------------NOUN----------------------------------------*/

    /* Case suffixes */

    define noun as (
    	[substring] among (
    		'{n}{a}' (<-'{n}')
    		'{n}{a'}' (<-'{n}')
    		
    		'{n'}{g}{i}{n}' (<-'{n'}') 
    		
    		'{g'}{i}{n}' (
    			test vowel delete
    			test substring among (
    				'{a}{a}' '{e}{e}' '{i}{i}' '{o}{o}' '{u}{u}' '{y}{y}' '{e'}{e'}' '{iu}{iu}' '{ia}{ia}' '{a'}{a'}' '{o'}{o'}' '{u'}{u'}'	([next] delete)
    				)
    			)	

    		'{n'}{g}{i}{g}' (<-'{n'}')
    		

    		
    		'{n'}{g}{a}{r}' '{n'}{g}{a'}{r}' (<-'{n'}')
    		'{g'}{a}{r}' '{g'}{a'}{r}' (
    			test vowel delete
    			test substring among (
    				'{a}{a}' '{e}{e}' '{i}{i}' '{o}{o}' '{u}{u}' '{y}{y}' '{e'}{e'}' '{iu}{iu}' '{ia}{ia}' '{a'}{a'}' '{o'}{o'}' '{u'}{u'}'	([next] delete)
    				)
    			)

    		'{n'}{g}{a}{s}' '{n'}{g}{a'}{s}' (<-'{n'}')
    		'{g'}{a}{s}' '{g'}{a'}{s}' (
    			test vowel delete
    			test substring among (
    				'{a}{a}' '{e}{e}' '{i}{i}' '{o}{o}' '{u}{u}' '{y}{y}' '{e'}{e'}' '{iu}{iu}' '{ia}{ia}' '{a'}{a'}' '{o'}{o'}' '{u'}{u'}'	([next] delete)
    				)
    			)

    		
 	  		'{n'}{g}{u}{r}' '{n'}{g}{u'}{r}' (<-'{n'}')
    		'{g'}{u}{r}' '{g'}{u'}{r}' (
    			test vowel delete
    			test substring among (
    				'{a}{a}' '{e}{e}' '{i}{i}' '{o}{o}' '{u}{u}' '{y}{y}' '{e'}{e'}' '{iu}{iu}' '{ia}{ia}' '{a'}{a'}' '{o'}{o'}' '{u'}{u'}'	([next] delete)
    				)
    			) 

    		
    		'{i}{n}' '{y}{n}' '{t}' '{i}{g}' '{y}{g}' '{a}{r}' '{a'}{r}' '{u}{r}' '{u'}{r}' '{l}{a}' '{l}{a'}' '{t}{a}' '{t}{a'}' '{a}{s}' '{a'}{s}'
    		(hop 2 delete)
            '{d}' (
                test not substring among (
                    '{n'}{g}{u}' '{n'}{g}{u'}' '{g}{u}' '{g}{u'}' '{k}{u}' '{k}{u'}' '{m}{u}' '{m}{u'}'
                    ()
                )
                (delete)
            )
    		'{n}' (test (vowel and hop 3) delete)
    		'{g}' (
    			test (vowel and hop 3) delete
    			test substring among (
    				'{a}{a}' '{e}{e}' '{i}{i}' '{o}{o}' '{u}{u}' '{y}{y}' '{e'}{e'}' '{iu}{iu}' '{ia}{ia}' '{a'}{a'}' '{o'}{o'}' '{u'}{u'}'	([next] delete)
    				)
    			)
    	)
    )

    /* Plural suffixes */

    define noun_plural as (
    	[substring] among (
            '{n'}{g}{u}{d}' '{n'}{g}{u'}{d}' (<-'{n'}') 
            '{g}{u}{d}' '{g}{u'}{d}' (<-'{g}')
            '{k}{u}{d}' '{k}{u'}{d}' (<-'{k}')
    		'{m}{u}{d}' '{m}{u'}{d}' '{u}{d}' '{u'}{d}' '{n}{r}' '{s}'
    		(delete)
    	)

    )

    /* Possessive: suffixes pointing on subject belonging (my, your, his/her, our etc) */

    define noun_possessive as (
    	[substring] among (
            '{n}{mya}' (
                test not substring among (
                    '{a}{n}' '{a'}{n}' '{i}{n}' '{y}{n}'
                    ()        
                )
                (delete)
            )

    		'{m}' '{ch}{n}' '{t}{n}' '{m}{d}{n}'
    		(delete) 
    	)
    )

    /* Impersonal possessive: suffixes pointing on subject belonging without personality */

    define noun_impersonal_possessive as (
        [substring] among (
            '{n}{n}{mya}' (
                test substring among (
                    '{a}' '{a'}' (delete)
                    '{i}' '{y}' (<- '{n}')
                )
            )

            '{a}{n}' '{a'}{n}' (
                (delete)
                test '{g'}' ([next] delete)        
            ) 

            '{r}{n}' (
                test substring among (
                    '{l}{a}' '{l}{a'}' (delete) 
                    '{a}' '{a'}' '{u}' '{u'}' (<- '{r}')
                ) 
            )  
            '{a}{s}{n}' (<- '{a}{s}') 
            '{a'}{s}{n}' (<- '{a'}{s}')
        )
    )

    /* Double declination: noun in genitive and connective cases can additionally change by case.

        On this step we just detach genitive and connective suffixes after "noun" step

    */

    define noun_double_declination as (
        [substring] among (
            '{n}{a}' (<-'{n}')
            '{n}{a'}' (<-'{n}')
            
            '{n'}{g}{i}{n}' (<-'{n'}') 
            
            '{g'}{i}{n}' (
                test vowel delete
                test substring among (
                    '{a}{a}' '{e}{e}' '{i}{i}' '{o}{o}' '{u}{u}' '{y}{y}' '{e'}{e'}' '{iu}{iu}' '{ia}{ia}' '{a'}{a'}' '{o'}{o'}' '{u'}{u'}' ([next] delete)
                    )
                )

            '{t}{a}' '{t}{a'}' (hop 2 delete)

        )
    )

/*---------------------------------VERB----------------------------------------*/


    
    define verb_number_person as (
        [substring] among (
            '{v}' '{v}{i}{d}{n}' (
                (delete)
                test substring among ('{u}' '{u'}' ([next] delete))
            )
            '{ch}' '{t}' 
            (delete)
        ) 
    )
    define verb_tense_mood as (
        [substring] among (
            '{zh'}{a}{n}{a}' '{zh'}{a'}{n}{a'}' '{ch}{a}{n}{a}' '{n}{a}' '{n}{a'}' '{a}' '{a'}' '{v}' '{l}{a}' '{l}{a'}' '{zh'}' '{ch}' '{s}{n}' '{s}{m}{n}' (delete)
            '{t}{n}' '{i}{i'}' '{i}{ia}' '{i'}' '{s}{a}' '{s}{a'}' '{s}{u}' '{s}{u'}' '{s}' '{g}' '{t}{kh}{a}' '{t}{kh}{a'}' '{v}{z}{a}' '{v}{z}{a'}' (delete) 
        )
    )

    define verb_stem as (
        [substring] among (
            '{g}{d}' '{u}{l}' '{u'}{l}' '{l}{g'}' '{l}{ts}' '{l}{d}' '{a}' '{a'}' /* verb voice (for example passive '{g}{d}')*/
            '{ch}{k}' '{zh'}{a}' '{zh'}{a'}' '{ts}{kh}{a}' '{ts}{kh}{a'}' /* verb view (for example complete view '{ch}{k}')*/
            (delete)
            '{r}{g}' (<- '{r}') 
            '{d}{kh}' (<- '{d}')
            '{s}{k}' (<- '{s}')
        )
    )






)

define stem as (
	
	backwards(
		
        do noun_possessive	
        do noun_impersonal_possessive	
        do noun
        do noun_double_declination
		do noun_plural
        do verb_number_person
        do verb_tense_mood
        do verb_stem
        
	)
)
